North Carolina statutes. Chapter 50A. Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act and Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act.
Article 1. Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act. [Repealed]

§§ 50A-1 through 50A-25.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-223, s. 1(b), effective October 1, 1999, and applicable to causes of action arising on or after that date.

Cross References.

See now the Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act,

G.S. 50A-101

et seq.